src/wa_affix.dat
SFX r Y 85
# omrin plurial
SFX r	0	s		[^s]
# -î -> -resse
SFX r	î	resse		[^cklnru]î
SFX r	cî	çresse		cî
SFX r	kî	cresse		kî
SFX r	lî	elresse		[^aåâeéêèiîoôuûçcg]lî
SFX r	î	resse		[aåâeéêèiîoôuû]lî
SFX r	clî	kelresse	clî
SFX r	çlî	celresse	çlî
SFX r	glî	guelresse	glî
SFX r	î	resse		[^r]nî
SFX r	î	eyresse		rnî
SFX r	î	iresse		[^aeioôu]rî
SFX r	î	resse		[aeioôu]rî
SFX r	î	resse		[^g]uî
SFX r	uî	resse		guî
# -î -> -resses
SFX r	î	resses		[^cklnru]î
SFX r	cî	çresses		cî
SFX r	kî	cresses		kî
SFX r	lî	elresses	[^aåâeéêèiîoôuûçcg]lî
SFX r	î	resses		[aåâeéêèiîoôuû]lî
SFX r	clî	kelresses	clî
SFX r	çlî	celresses	çlî
SFX r	glî	guelresses	glî
SFX r	î	resses		[^r]nî
SFX r	î	eyresses	rnî
SFX r	î	iresses		[^aeioôu]rî
SFX r	î	resses		[aeioôu]rî
SFX r	î	resses		[^g]uî
SFX r	uî	resses		guî
# -eu -> -resse
SFX r	eu	resse		[^ciklrsuy]eu
SFX r	ceu	çresse		ceu
SFX r	ieu	eyresse		ieu
SFX r	keu	cresse		keu
SFX r	leu	elresse		[^aåâeéêèiîoôuûçcg]leu
SFX r	eu	resse		[aåâeéêèiîoôuû]leu
SFX r	cleu	kelresse	cleu
SFX r	çleu	celresse	çleu
SFX r	gleu	guelresse	gleu
SFX r	reu	erresse		[^aåâeéêèiîoôuûny]reu
SFX r	eu	resse		[aåâeéêèiîoôuûny]reu
SFX r	seu	resse		sseu
SFX r	eu	resse		[^s]seu
SFX r	eu	resse		[^g]ueu
SFX r	ueu	resse		gueu
SFX r	iyeu	eyresse		iyeu			# riyeu, reyresse
SFX r	eu	resse		[^aåâeéêèiîôuû]yeu
# -eu -> -resses
SFX r	eu	resses		[^ciklrsuy]eu
SFX r	ceu	çresses		ceu
SFX r	ieu	eyresses	ieu
SFX r	keu	cresses		keu
SFX r	leu	elresses	[^aåâeéêèiîoôuûçcg]leu
SFX r	eu	resses		[aåâeéêèiîoôuû]leu
SFX r	cleu	kelresses	cleu
SFX r	çleu	celresses	çleu
SFX r	gleu	guelresses	gleu
SFX r	reu	erresses	[^aåâeéêèiîoôuûny]reu
SFX r	eu	resses		[aåâeéêèiîoôuûny]reu
SFX r	seu	resses		sseu
SFX r	eu	resses		[^s]seu
SFX r	eu	resses		[^g]ueu
SFX r	ueu	resses		gueu
SFX r	iyeu	eyresses	iyeu			# riyeu, reyresse
SFX r	eu	resses		[^aåâeéêèiîôuû]yeu
# ôtes -> -resse
SFX r	0	resse		[^eîlru]
SFX r	e	resse		[^cu]e
SFX r	ue	resse		gue
SFX r	ce	çresse		ce
SFX r	eur	oresse		[^cku]eur
SFX r	ceur	çoresse		ceur
SFX r	keur	coresse		keur
SFX r	eur	oresse		[^g]ueur
SFX r	ueur	oresse		gueur
SFX r	0	iresse		[^u]r
SFX r	0	iresse		l
# ôtes -> -resses
SFX r	0	resses		[^eîlru]
SFX r	e	resses		[^cu]e
SFX r	ue	resses		gue
SFX r	ce	çresse		ce
SFX r	eur	oresses		[^cku]eur
SFX r	ceur	çoresses	ceur
SFX r	keur	coresses	keur
SFX r	eur	oresses		[^g]ueur
SFX r	ueur	oresses		gueur
SFX r	0	iresses		[^u]r
SFX r	0	iresses		l

# ------------------------------------------------------------

SFX l Y 3
SFX l   ci	cial		ci
SFX l   ci	chal		ci
SFX l   ci	la		ci

# ------------------------------------------------------------

SFX S Y 6
SFX S	0	-t		[aåâeéêèiîoôuû]	# a-t i schouté?
SFX S	0	-st		[^s][^t]	# dj' a-st aresté
SFX S	e	rece		[^cku]e
SFX S	ce	çrece		ce
SFX S	ke	crece		ke
SFX S	ue	rece		ue

# ------------------------------------------------------------

REP 57
REP a ae
REP à a
REP â å
REP aî ai
REP au å
REP au ô
REP ch xh
REP ch sch
REP cha cea
REP cha xhea
REP csi cci
REP dja dia
REP djè die
REP dju diu
REP è e
REP è ae
REP ê ea
REP ê ai
REP eû oe
REP eû eu
REP eûs éves
REP eus éves
REP eût éve
REP eut éve
REP éve eu
REP èy ey
REP éy êy
REP h jh
REP h xh
REP h sch
REP ia ea
REP in én
REP îr ir
REP îy iy
REP îy ey
REP j jh
REP j dj
REP ja jhea
REP ka ca
REP kr cr
REP o å
REP ô oi
REP on oen
REP oû ô
REP oû oi
REP qu k
REP qw cw
REP sk sch
REP tcha tia
REP tchè tie
REP tcho tio
REP tchu tiu
REP wâ oi
REP wè oe
REP wè oi
REP wé oi
REP win oen
